Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-284
Application for registration; amendments.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any arrangements or other facts described have changed making the application false in any respect, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file in the office of the Secretary of State a certificate, signed and sworn to by a general partner, correcting such statement.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 52;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 54.